apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="f/oot__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oot</l>       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oot's</l>     <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>eet's</l>     <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oot</l>       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/other__n">
  <e>       <p><l>other</l>     <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>other's</l>   <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>others</l>    <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>others'</l>   <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ethren</l>    <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="larva__n">
      <!-- cf. aorta -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>e's</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aorta__n">
      <!-- cf. larva -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lir/a__n">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>a's</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>e's</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="novell/a__n">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>a's</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>as'</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ind/ex__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ex</l>        <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ex's</l>      <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>exes</l>      <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>exes'</l>     <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ices</l>      <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="appendi/x__n">
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>x's</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ces'</l>      <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>xes</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="laryn/x__n">
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>x's</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ges'</l>      <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>xes</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="equino/x__n">
  <e>       <p><l>x</l>         <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>x's</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>xes</l>       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>xes'</l>      <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ctes</l>      <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="criteri/on__n">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>on's</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>a's</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ox__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>en's</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quiz__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zes</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>zes'</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="schema__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="modul/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us's</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>i's</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="stimul/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us's</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>i's</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cact/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us's</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>i's</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uses</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="asparag/us__n">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us's</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us's</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uses</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="gen/us__n">
      <!-- cf. op/us__n -->
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us's</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>era</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>era's</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uses</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="algia">           <i>algi</i><par n="lir/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="areola">          <i>areola</i><par n="aorta__n"/></e>
<e lm="asparagus">       <i>asparag</i><par n="asparag/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="ballista">        <i>ballista</i><par n="aorta__n"/></e>
<e lm="blastula">        <i>blastula</i><par n="aorta__n"/></e>
<e lm="brother">         <i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/></e>
<e lm="brother in arms"> <i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>arms</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>arms</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="brother-in-law">  <i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/><p><l>-in-law</l><r><g>-in-law</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="bronchus">        <i>bronch</i><par n="modul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="bursa">           <i>bursa</i><par n="aorta__n"/></e>
<e lm="cactus">          <i>cact</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="calyx">           <i>caly</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="catena">          <i>catena</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="circumflex">      <i>circumfl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="cirrus">          <i>cirr</i><par n="modul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="complex">         <i>compl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="criterion">       <i>criteri</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="decidua">         <i>decidua</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="earwax">          <i>earwa</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="empyema">         <i>empyema</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="equinox">         <i>equino</i><par n="equino/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="eucalyptus">      <i>eucalypt</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="foot">            <i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/></e>
<e lm="fez">             <i>fez</i><par n="quiz__n"/></e>
<e lm="fistula">         <i>fistula</i><par n="aorta__n"/></e>
<e lm="focus">           <i>foc</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="funiculus">       <i>funicul</i><par n="modul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="genus">           <i>gen</i><par n="gen/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="genius">          <i>geni</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="half-brother">    <i>half-br</i><par n="br/other__n"/></e>
<e lm="holohedron" a="marcriera"><i>holohedr</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="icebox">          <i>icebo</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="index">           <i>ind</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="larynx">          <i>laryn</i><par n="laryn/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="latex">           <i>late</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="lipogranuloma">   <i>lipogranuloma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="lira">            <i>lir</i><par n="lir/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="macronucleus">    <i>macronucle</i><par n="modul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="maximin criterion"><i>maximin<b/>criteri</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="muskox">          <i>muskox</i><par n="ox__n"/></e>
<e lm="myxoma">          <i>myxoma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="narthex">         <i>narth</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="novella">         <i>novell</i><par n="novell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="nucleus">         <i>nucle</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="onomatopoeia">    <i>onomatopoeia</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="ox">              <i>ox</i><par n="ox__n"/></e>
<e lm="pentahedron">     <i>pentahedr</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="plasmalemma">     <i>plasmalemma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="platypus">        <i>platyp</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="pylorus">         <i>pylor</i><par n="modul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="quiz">            <i>quiz</i><par n="quiz__n"/></e>
<e lm="radius">          <i>radi</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
<e lm="radius of convergence"><i>radi</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/><p><l><b/>of<b/>convergence</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>convergence</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="radius of curvature"><i>radi</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/><p><l><b/>of<b/>curvature</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>curvature</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="spandex">         <i>spand</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="suffix">          <i>suffi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="synaloepha">      <i>synaloepha</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="tetrahedron">     <i>tetrahedr</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="trachoma">        <i>trachoma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="vertebra">        <i>vertebra</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
